Maryland, session 2026, SB0012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment.
Italics indicate opposite chamber/conference co mm i tte e a m en dm en ts*. sb0012*

SENATE BILL 12
Article – Real Property
8–122.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNITS IN
APARTMENT BUILDINGS WITH FOUR 10 OR MORE INDIVIDUAL DWELLING UNITS.
(2) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNIT
THAT IS:
(I) LOCATED LOCATED ON PROPERTY LISTED ON THE
NATIONAL REGISTER OF HISTORIC PLACES;
(II) PART OF A HOUSING AUTHORITY OF BALTIMORE CITY
DEVELOPMENT BUILT BETWEEN 1940 AND 1950, INCLUSIVE; OR
(III) A ROWHOUSE PUBLIC HOUSING UNIT ACQUIRED AND
REHABILITATED BY THE HOUSING AUTHORITY OF BALTIMORE CITY BETWEEN 1960
AND 1997, INCLUSIVE.
(B) A LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE AIR–CONDITIONING IN EACH
RESIDENTIAL UNIT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION AS
FOLLOWS:
(1) BEGINNING JUNE 1, 2026, FOR NEWLY CONSTRUCTED
RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNITS; AND
(2) BEGINNING JUNE 1, 2026, FOR RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNITS
WHERE, AT ANY TIME ON OR AFTER JANUARY 1, 2025:
(I) THE LANDLORD EQUIPPED THE UNIT WITH
AIR–CONDITIONING OR PROVIDED AIR–CONDITIONING; OR
(II) A LEASE REQUIRED THE LANDLORD TO PROVIDE
AIR–CONDITIONING FOR THE UNIT; AND
(3) BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2026, FOR RESIDENTIAL RENTAL UNITS
THAT UNDERGO RENOVATION THAT INCLUDES THE REPLACEMENT OR SUBSTANTIAL
UPGRADE OF ELECTRICAL SYSTEMS OR HEATING SYSTEMS.
(C) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE NECESSARY FOR PURPOSES OF REASONABLE
MAINTENANCE AND REPAIR, EACH YEAR FROM JUNE 1 TO SEPTEMBER 30, BOTH
INCLUSIVE, A LANDLORD SHALL PROVIDE AIR–CONDITIONING IN EACH
RESIDENTIAL UNIT AS FOLLOWS:

SENATE BILL 12 3
(1) FOR AN AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM THAT IS NOT UNDER THE
CONTROL OF THE TENANT, THE LANDLORD SHALL MAINTAIN THE TEMPERATURE IN
THE UNIT AT NOT GREATER THAN 80 DEGREES FAHRENHEIT AT 3 FEET ABOVE THE
FLOOR LEVEL IN EACH HABITABLE SPACE IN THE UNIT; AND
(2) FOR AN AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM THAT IS UNDER THE
CONTROL OF THE TENANT, THE LANDLORD SHALL ENSURE THAT THE
AIR–CONDITIONING SYSTEM IS IN GOOD WORKING ORDER AND IS CAPABLE OF
MAINTAINING THE TEMPERATURE IN THE UNIT AT NOT GREATER THAN 80 DEGREES
FAHRENHEIT AT 3 FEET ABOVE THE FLOOR LEVEL IN EACH HABITABLE SPACE IN
THE UNIT.
(D) THIS SECTION SHALL PREEMPT AND SUPERSEDE A LOCAL LAW,
ORDINANCE, POLICY, OR REGULATION ENACTED BY A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OR
AGENCY THAT IMPOSES AIR–CONDITIONING REQUIREMENTS INCONSISTENT WITH
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any building construction or renovation for which the building permit is
issued before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.